en: E470a(iii), Calcium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470a(iii)
ar: E470a(iii), أملاح الكالسيوم للأحماض الدهنية
az: E470a(iii), Yağ turşularının kalsium duzları
bg: E470a(iii), Калциеви соли на мастни киселини
ca: E470a(iii), Sals de calci dels àcids grassos
cs: E470a(iii), Vápenaté soli mastných kyselin
da: E470a(iii), Calciumsalte af fedtsyrer
de: E470a(iii), Calciumsalze der Speisefettsäuren
el: E470a(iii), Άλατα ασβεστίου λιπαρών οξέων
eo: E470a(iii), Kalciaj saloj de grasacidoj
es: E470a(iii), Sales de calcio de ácidos grasos
et: E470a(iii), Rasvhapete kaltsiumsoolad
fa: E470a(iii), نمک های کلسیم اسیدهای چرب
fi: E470a(iii), Rasvahappojen kalsiumsuolat, Rasvahappojen kalsiumsuoloja
fr: E470a(iii), Sels de calcium d'acides gras
ga: E470a(iii), Salain chailciam d'aigéid shailleacha
gl: E470a(iii), Sales de calcio de ácidos graxos
he: E470a(iii), מלחי סידן של חומצות שומן
hi: E470a(iii), वसा अम्ल के कैल्शियम लवण
hr: E470a(iii), Kalcijeve soli masnih kiselina
hu: E470a(iii), Zsírsavak kalciumsói
id: E470a(iii), Garam kalsium asam lemak
it: E470a(iii), Sali di calcio degli acidi grassi
ja: E470a(iii), 脂肪酸カルシウム塩
ko: E470a(iii), 지방산 칼슘 염
lt: E470a(iii), Kalcio riebalų rūgščių druskos
lv: E470a(iii), Kalcija taukskābju sāļi
mk: E470a(iii), Калциумови соли на масни киселини
ms: E470a(iii), Garam kalsium asid lemak
mt: E470a(iii), Imħlieħ tal-kalċju tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E470a(iii), Calciumzouten van vetzuren
no: E470a(iii), Kalsiumsalter av fettsyrer
pl: E470a(iii), Sole wapniowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470a(iii), Sais de cálcio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470a(iii), Săruri de calciu ale acizilor grași
ru: E470a(iii), Кальциевые соли жирных кислот
sk: E470a(iii), Vápenaté soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470a(iii), Kalcijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sq: E470a(iii), Kripërat e kalciumit të acideve yndyrore
sr: E470a(iii), Калијумове соли масних киселина
sv: E470a(iii), Kalciumsalter av fettsyror
th: E470a(iii), เกลือแคลเซียมของกรดไขมัน
tr: E470a(iii), Yağ asitlerinin kalsiyum tuzları
uk: E470a(iii), Кальцієві солі жирних кислот
zh: E470a(iii), 脂肪酸钙盐

en: E470b, Magnesium salts of fatty acids
xx: E470b
bg: E470b, Магнезиеви соли на мастни киселини
ca: E470b, Sal magnèsica d'àcids grassos, sals de magnesi d'àcids grassos
cs: E470b, Hořečnaté soli mastných kyselin
da: E470b, Magnesiumsalte af fedtsyrer
de: E470b, Magnesiumsalze der Speisefettsäuren
el: E470b, Αλατα λιπαρων οξεων με μαγνησιο
es: E470b, Sales magnésicas de ácidos grasos, sales de magnesio de ácidos grasos
et: E470b, Rasvhapete magneesiumisoolad
fi: E470b, Rasvahappojen magnesiumsuolat, Rasvahappojen magnesiumsuoloja
fr: E470b, Sels de magnésium d'acides gras, Sel de magnésium d'acides gras
hr: E470b, magn soli masnih kiselina
hu: E470b, Zsírsavak magnéziumsói
it: E470b, Sali di magnesio degli acidi grassi
lt: E470b, Magnesium salts of fatty acids
lv: E470b, Taukskābju magnija sāļi
mt: E470b, Imlieħ tal-manjeżju tal-aċidi grassi
nb: E470b, Magnesiumsalter av fettsyrer
nl: E470b, Magnesiumzouten van vetzuren
pl: E470b, Sole magnezowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E470b, Sais de magnésio de ácidos gordos
ro: E470b, Săruri de magneziu ale acizilor grași
sk: E470b, Horečnaté soli mastných kyselín
sl: E470b, Magnezijeve soli maščobnih kislin
sv: E470b, Magnesiumsalter av fettsyror

en: E471, Mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids, Glyceryl monostearate, Glyceryl monopalmitate, Glyceryl monooleate, Monostearin, Monopalmitin, Monoolein, Mono and diglycerides
xx: E471
ar: E471, أحادي وثنائي الجليسريدات للأحماض الدهنية
bg: E471, Моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини, Глицерил моностеарат, глицерил монопалмитат, глицерил моноолеат, и т.н., моностеарин, монопалмитин, моноолеин
ca: E471, Monoglicèrids i diglicèrids d'àcids grassos, Monoglicèrid o diglicèrid d'àcids grassos, monoglicèrids i diglicèrids dels àcids grassos
cs: E471, Mono- a diglyceridy mastných kyselin, Glycerylmonostearát, glycerylmonopalmitát, glycerylmonooleát, monostearin, monopalmitin, monoolein
da: E471, Mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer, Glycerylmonostearat, glycerylmonopalmitat
de: E471, Mono- und Diglyceride von Speisefettsäuren, Glycerylmonostearat, Glycerylmonopalmitat, Glycerylmonooleat, Monostearin, Monopalmitin, Monoolein
el: E471, Μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων, Μονοστεατικό γλυκερύλιο, μονοπαλμιτικό γλυκερύλιο, μονοελαϊκό γλυκερύλιο, μονοστεατίνη, μονοπαλμιτίνη
es: E471, mono- y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Mono y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, mono y diglicéridos de los ácidos grasos, Monodiglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Monoestearato de glicerilo, monopalmitato de glicerilo, monooleato de glicerilo, monoestearina, monopalmitina, monooleína
et: E471, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidid, Glütserüülmonostearaat, glütserüülmonopalmitaat, glütserüülmonooleaat, monosteariin, monopalmitiin
fi: E471, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridit, Glyseryylimonostearaatti, Glyseryylimonopalmitaatti, Glyseryylimono-oleaatti, Monosteariini, Monopalmitiini, Mono-oleiini
fr: E471, Mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, Mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras alimentaires, Monoglycérides et diglycérides d'acides gras, Mono et diglycérides d'acides gras, Monostéarate de glycérine, Monopalmitate de glycérine, Monooléate de glycérine, Monostéarine, monopalmitine, monooléine, Mono and diglycerides of fatty acids, glyceryl monostearate, glyceryl distearate , Monostéarine
hr: E471, mono- i digliceridi masnih kiselina, mono - i digliceridi masnih kiselina, emuglator e471, monogliceridi i digliceridi masnih kiselina, monogliceridi i digliceridi masnih kiselina e471, mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina, mono - i diglicerida masnih kiselina
hu: E471, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjei, Gliceril-monosztearát, Gliceril-monopalmitát, Gliceril-monooleát, Monosztearin, monopalmitin, monoolein
it: E471, Mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi, Monostearato di glicerile, monopalmitato di glicerile, monooleato di glicerile, monostearina, monopalmitina, monooleina, mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi alimentari
lt: E471, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridai, Glicerilmonostearatas, glicerilmonopalmitatas, glicerilmonooleatas, monostearinas, monopalmitinas, monooleinas
lv: E471, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdi, Glicerilmonostearāts, Glicerilmonopalmitāts, Glicerilmonooleāts, monostearīns, monopalmitīns, monooleīns
mt: E471, Mono- u digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi, Monostearat tal-gliċeril, Monopalmitat tal-gliċeril, Monooleat tal-gliċeril, Monostearina, Monopalmitina, Monooleina
nb: E471, Mono- og diglyserider av fettsyrer
nl: E471, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren, Glycerylmonostearaat, glycerylmonopalmitaat, glycerylmonoöleaat, monostearine, monopalmitine, monoöleïne
nn: E471, mono- och diglycerider av fettsyror
pl: E471, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych, monopalmitynian glicerolu, monooleinian glicerolu, monostearynian, monopalmitynian, monooleinian, glicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E471, Mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos, mono e diglicerídeos de ácidos gordos, Monoestearato de glicerilo, monopalmitato de glicerilo, monooleato de glicerilo, Monoestearina, monopalmitina, monooleína
ro: E471, Mono- și digliceride ale acizilor grași, Monostearat de gliceril, Monopalmitat de gliceril, Monooleat de gliceril, Monostearină, Monopalmitină, Monooleină
ru: E471, Моно- и диглицериды жирных кислот, моно - и диглицериды жирных кислот, моно-и диглицериды жирных кислот, диглицериды жирных кислот, и диглицериды жирных кислот
sk: E471, Mono- a diglyceridy mastných kyselín, Glycerylmonostearát, glycerilmonopalmitát, glycerylmonooleát, monostearín, monopalmitín, monooleín
sl: E471, Mono- in digliceridi maščobnih kislin, gliceril monostearat, gliceril monopalmitat, gliceril monooleat, monostearin, monopalmitin, monoolein
sr: E471, mono- i digleciridi masnih kiselina
sv: E471, mono- och diglycerider av fettsyror, mono- och diglycerider av fett, mono- o diglycerider av fettsyror, glycerylmonostearat, glycerylmonopalmitat, glycerylmonooleat, monostearin, monopalmitin, monoolein
th: โมโน- และไดกลีเซอไรด์ของกรดไขมัน

en: mono- and diglycerides of vegetable fatty acids
sv: mono- och diglycerider av vegetabiliska fettsyror, E471 av vegetabiliskt fett, mono- och diglycerider av vegetabilisk fett, mono o diglycerider av fettsyror (vegetabilisk)

en: E472, acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472
ar: E472, استرات الأحماض الدهنية الأحادية وثنائية الجليسريد
az: E472, yağ turşularının mono- və digliseridlərinin turşu efirləri
bg: E472, киселинни естери на моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
ca: E472, èsters àcids de mono- i diglicèrids d'àcids grassos
cs: E472, kyselé estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin
da: E472, syreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472, Säureester von Mono- und Diglyceride von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472, όξινοι εστέρες των μονο- και διγλυκεριδίων των λιπαρών οξέων
es: E472, ésteres ácidos de mono- y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E472, rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide happelised estrid
fi: E472, Rasvahappojen esterien seokset, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien happoesterit
fr: E472, Esters d'acides gras alimentaires
gl: E472, Ésteres de ácidos graxos alimentarios
hr: E472, kiselinski esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
hu: E472, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek észterei, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek savas észterei
it: E472, esteri dei mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi, esteri acidi di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
ja: E472, 脂肪酸のモノグリセリドとジグリセリドの酸エステル
ko: E472, 지방산의 모노글리세리드 및 디글리세리드의 산 에스테르
lt: E472, riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472, taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu skābie esteri
mk: E472, киселински естери на моно- и диглицериди на масни киселини
nl: E472, Esters van mono- en diglyceriden
pl: E472, estry kwasów tłuszczowych mono- i diglicerydów
pt: E472, ésteres ácidos de mono e diglicerídeos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472, esteri acizi ai mono- și digliceridelor acizilor grași
ru: E472, эфиры кислот моно- и диглицеридов жирных кислот
sk: E472, kyslé estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín
sl: E472, kislinski estri mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sv: E472, syraestrar av mono- och diglycerider av fettsyror
tr: E472, yağ asitlerinin mono ve digiseridleri, yağ asitlerinin mono ve digliseritlerinin asit esterleri
zh: E472, 脂肪酸的单甘油酯和二甘油酯的酸酯

en: E472a, Acetic acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472a
bg: E472a, Естери на оцетната киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
bs: E472a, Acetatni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
ca: E472a, Èster acètic de monoglicèrids o diglicèrids d'àcids grassos
cs: E472a, Estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou octovou
da: E472a, Edikkesyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472a, Essigsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472a, Εστερες του οξικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472a, Ésteres acéticos de monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E472a, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid äädikhappega
fi: E472a, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien etikkahappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien etikkahappoestereitä
fr: E472a, Ester diacétyl-acétique d'acides gras, Esters acétiques des mono- et diglycérides, Acétoglycerides, Esters glycéroliques de l'acide acétique et d'acides gras, Esters acétiques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras
gl: E472a, Éster diacetil-acético de ácidos graxos
hr: E472a, esteri octene kiseline mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina, ester octene kiseline mono i diglicerida masnih kiselina
hu: E472a, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek ecetsav-észterei
it: E472a, Esteri acetici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
ja: E472a, グリセリン酢酸脂肪酸エステル
lt: E472a, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų acto rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472a, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu etiķskābes esteri
mt: E472a, Esteri tal-aċidu aċetiku tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E472a, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met azijnzuur
nn: E472a, eddiksyreestere av mon- og diglyserider av fettsyrer
pl: E472a, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane kwasem octowym
pt: E472a, Ésteres acéticos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472a, Esteri ai acidului acetic cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E472a, Estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou octovou
sl: E472a, Acetatni estri mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sr: E472a, Ацетатни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472a, Mono- och diglyceriders ättiksyraestrar
tr: E472a, acetic asit esters of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472a, Естери гліцерину та оцтової і жирних кислот

en: E472b, Lactic acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472b
bg: E472b, Естери на млечната киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
bs: E472b, Lactatni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
cs: E472b, Estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou mléčnou
da: E472b, Mælkesyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472b, Milchsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472b, Εστερες του γαλακτικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472b, Ésteres lácticos de monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E472b, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid piimhappega
fi: E472b, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien maitohappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien maitohappoestereitä
fr: E472b, Ester diacétyl-lactique de mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, Esters lactiques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras
gl: Éster diacetil-láctico de mono- e diglicéridos de ácidos graxos
hr: E472b, esteri mliječne kiseline mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina, ester mliječne kiseline mono i diglicerida masnih kiselina
hu: E472b, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek tejsav-észterei
it: E472b, Esteri lattici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
ja: E472b, グリセリン乳酸脂肪酸エステル
lt: E472b, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų pieno rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472b, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu pienskābes esteri
mt: E472b, Esteri tal-aċidi lattiċi tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E472b, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met melkzuur
nn: E472b, Melkesyreester av mono- og diglyserider av næringsfettsyrer
pl: E472b, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane kwasem mlekowym
pt: E472b, Ésteres lácticos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472b, Esteri ai acidului lactic cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E472b, Estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou mliečnou
sl: E472b, Laktatni estri mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sr: E472b, Лацтатни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472b, Mono- och diglyceriders mjölksyraestrar
tr: E472b, laktik asit esterleri of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472b, Естери гліцерину та молочної і жирних кислот

en: E472c, Citric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472c
bg: E472c, Естери на лимонената киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
bs: E472c, citratni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
ca: E472c, èsters cítrics dels monoglicèrids i diglicèrids d'àcids grassos
cs: E472c, Estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou citronovou
da: E472c, Citronsyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472c, Citronensäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472c, Εστερες του κιτρικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472c, Ésteres cítricos de monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Ésteres cítricos de mono y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E472c, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid sidrunhappega
fi: E472c, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien sitruunahappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien sitruunahappoestereitä
fr: E472c, Ester citrique des mono et diglycérides d'acides gras alimentaires, Ester diacétyl-citrique de mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, esters citriques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, Esters glycéroliques de l'acide citrique et d'acides gras, Citroglycérides
gl: E472c, Éster diacetil-cítrico de mono- e diglicéridos de ácidos graxos
hr: E472c
hu: E472c, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek citromsav-észterei
it: E472c, Esteri citrici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi, esteri citrici dei mono e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
ja: E472c, グリセリンクエン酸脂肪酸エステル
lt: E472c, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų citrinų rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472c, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu citronskābes esteri
mt: E472c, Esteri tal-aċidu ċitriku tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E472c, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met citroenzuur
nn: E472c, Sitronsyreester av mono- og diglyserider av næringsfettsyrer
pl: E472c, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane kwasem cytrynowym, estry kwasu cytrynowego z mono- i diglicerydami kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E472c, Ésteres cítricos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472c, Esteri ai acidului citric cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E472c, Estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou citrónovou
sl: E472c, Citratni estri mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sr: E472c, цитратни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472c, Mono- och diglyceriders citronsyraestrar
tr: E472c, sitrik asit esterleri of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472c, Естери гліцерину та лимонної і жирних кислот

en: E472d, Tartaric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472d
bg: E472d, Естери на винената киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
bs: E472d, Tartaratni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
cs: E472d, Estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou vinnou
da: E472d, Vinsyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472d, Weinsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472d, Εστερες του τρυγικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472d, Ésteres tartáricos de monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E472d, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid viinhappega
fi: E472d, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien viinihappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien viinihappoestereitä
fr: E472d, Ester tartrique de mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, Esters tartriques de mono- et di-glycérides d'acides gras, Esters tartriques des mono- et diglycérides, Esters tartriques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras
gl: E472d, Éster tártrico de mono- e diglicéridos de ácidos graxos
hr: E472d  mono - i diacetilni esteri vinske kiseline mono - i diglicerida masnih kiselina
hu: E472d, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek borkősav-észterei
it: E472d, Esteri tartarici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
ja: E472d, グリセリン酒石酸脂肪酸エステル
lt: E472d, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų vyno rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472d, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu vīnskābes esteri
mt: E472d, Esteri tal-aċidu tartariku tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E472d, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met wijnsteenzuur
nn: E472d, Vinsyreester av mono- og diglyserider av næringsfettsyrer
pl: E472d, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane kwasem winowym
pt: E472d, Ésteres tartáricos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472d, Esteri ai acidului tartric cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E472d, Estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou vínnou
sl: E472d, Tartratni estri mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sr: E472d, Тартаратни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472d, Mono- och diglyceriders vinsyraestrar
tr: E472d, tartarik asit esters of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472d, Естери моно- та дигліцеридів та винної і жирних кислот

en: E472e, Mono- and diacetyltartaric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids, Mono- and diacetyl tartaric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids, DATEM, Mono- and diacetyltartaric esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids, emulsifier E472e
xx: E472e
bg: E472e, Естери на моно- и диацетилвинената киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини, емулгатор e472e
bs: E472e, Mono- i diacetil tartaratni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
ca: E472e, Èsters monoacetil i diacetil tartàrics de monoglicèrids i diglicèrids d'àcids grassos, èster monoacetiltartàric o diacetiltartàric de monoglicèrids o diglicèrids d'àcids grassos, Emulsionant e472e
cs: E472e, Estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou mono- a diacetylvinnou
da: E472e, Mono- og diacetylvinsyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472e, Mono- und Diacetylweinsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren, Diacetylweinsäureglyceride, Diacetylweinsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren, Emulgator E472e
el: E472e, Εστερες του μονο- και διακετυλοτρυγικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472e, Ésteres monoacetiltartárico y diacetiltartárico de monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Éster monoacetiltartárico de mono- y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos, Emulsionante e472e
et: E472e, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid mono- ja diatsetüülviinhappega
fi: E472e, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien mono- ja diasetyyliviinihappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien mono- ja diasetyyliviinihappoestereitä, emulgointiaine e472e
fr: E472e, Ester Monoacéthyltartrique de mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, Esters monoacétyltartriques et diacétyltartriques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, esters monoacétyltartrique et diacétyltartrique des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, esters monoacétyltartriques et diacétyltartriques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras, DATEM, émulsifiant e472e
gl: E472e, Éster monoacetiltártrico de mono- e diglicéridos de ácidos graxos
hr: E472e, monoglicerid
hu: E472e, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek mono- és diacetil-borkősav-észterei
it: E472e, Esteri mono- e diacetiltartarici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi, emulsionante E472e
ja: E472e, グリセリンジアセチル酒石酸脂肪酸エステル
lt: E472e, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų mono- ir diacetilvyno rūgšties esteriai, Riebiųjų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų mono- ir diacetilvyno rūgšties esteriai
lv: E472e, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu mono- un diacetilvīnskābes esteri
mt: E472e, Esteri tal-aċidu mono- u diaċetiltartariku tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nb: E472e, Mono- og diacetylvinsyreester av MDG
nl: E472e, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met mono- en diacetylwijnsteenzuur
nn: E472e, Mono- og diacetylvinsyreester av mono- og diglyserider av næringsfettsyrer
pl: E472e, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane kwasem mono- i diacetylowinowym
pt: E472e, Ésteres mono e diacetiltartáricos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472e, Esteri ai acizilor mono- și diacetiltartric cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
ru: E472e, Эфиры глицерина диацетилвинной и жирных кислот
sk: E472e, Estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou mono- a diacetylvínnou
sl: E472e, E472e food additive
sr: E472e, Моно- и диацетил тартаратни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472e, Mono- och diglyceriders mono- och diacetylvinsyraestrar, Diglyceriders diacetylvinsyraestrar, Mono- och diglyceriders diacetylvinsyraestrar, Monoglyceriders monoacetylvinsyraestrar
tr: E472e, diasetiltartarik asit esters of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472e, Естери гліцерину та діацетилвинної і жирних кислот

en: E472f, Mixed acetic and tartaric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E472f
bg: E472f, Смесени естери на оцетната и винената киселина с моно- и диглицериди на мастни киселини
bs: E472f, Miješani acetatni i tartaratni esteri mono- i diglicerida masnih kiselina
cs: E472f, Směsné estery mono- a diglyceridů mastných kyselin s kyselinou octovou a vinnou
da: E472f, Blandede eddikesyre- og vinsyreestere af mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E472f, Gemischte Essig- und Weinsäureester von Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E472f, Μεικτοι εστερες του οξικου και τρυγικου οξεος με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E472f, Mixed acetic and tartaric acid esters of mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids
et: E472f, Rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid äädik- ja viinhappe seguga
fi: E472f, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien etikka- ja viinihappoesterit, Rasvahappojen mono- ja diglyseridien etikka- ja viinihappoestereitä
fr: E472f, Esters mixtes acétiques et tartriques des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras
gl: E472f, Ésteres mixtos acéticos e tártricos mono- e diglicéridos de ácidos graxos
hr: E472f
hu: E472f, Zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeinek vegyes ecetsav- és borkősav-észterei
it: E472f, Esteri misti acetico-tartarici di mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi
lt: E472f, Riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų acto ir vyno rūgščių mišinio esteriai
lv: E472f, Taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdu jauktie etiķskābes un vīnskābes esteri
mt: E472f, Esteri tal-aċidu aċetiku u l-aċidu tartariku mħallta tal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E472f, Mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren veresterd met een mengsel van azijnzuur en wijnsteenzuur
nn: E472f, Blandete vin- og eddiksyreester av mono- og diglyserider av næringsfettsyrer
pl: E472f, Mono- i diglicerydy kwasów tłuszczowych estryfikowane mieszaniną kwasu octowego i winowego
pt: E472f, Ésteres mistos acéticos e tartáricos de mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E472f, Amestec de esteri ai acidului acetic și ai acidului tartric cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E472f, Zmesné estery mono- a diglyceridov mastných kyselín s kyselinou octovou a vínnou
sl: E472f, Mešanica acetatnih in tartratnih estrov mono- in digliceridov maščobnih kislin
sr: E472f, Мијешани ацетатни и тартаратни естери моно- и диглицерида масних киселина
sv: E472f, Blandade ättik- och vinsyraestrar av mono- och diglycerider
tr: E472f, mixed asetik ve tartarik asit esters of mono- ve diglycerides of fatty asits
uk: E472f, Змішані естери гліцерину та винної, оцтової і жирних кислот

en: E472g, Succinylated monoglycerides
xx: E472g
ar: E472g, مونوغليسريدات سكسينيلات
bg: E472g, Сукцинилирани моноглицериди
ca: E472g, Monoglicèrids succinilats
cs: E472g, Sukcinylované monoglyceridy
da: E472g, Succinylerede monoglycerider
de: E472g, Succinylierte Monoglyceride
el: E472g, Ηλεκτρικά μονογλυκερίδια
es: E472g, Monoglicéridos succinilados
et: E472g, Suktsinüülitud monoglütseriidid
fi: E472g, Sukkinyloidut monoglyseridit, Sukkinyloituja monoglysereitä
fr: E472g, Monoglycérides succinyles
hu: E472g, Szukcinilezett monogliceridek
it: E472g, Monogliceridi succinilati
ja: E472g, コハク酸モノグリセリド
ko: E472g, 숙신산 모노글리세리드
lt: E472g, Sukcinilinti monogliceridai
lv: E472g, Sukcinilēti monoglicerīdi
nl: E472g, Gesuccinyleerde monoglyceriden
pl: E472g, Monoglicerydy sukcynylowane
pt: E472g, Monoglicerídeos succinilados
ro: E472g, Monogliceride succinilate
ru: E472g, Сукцинилированные моноглицериды
sk: E472g, Sukcinylované monoglyceridy
sl: E472g, Sukcinilirani monogliceridi
sv: E472g, Succinylerade monoglycerider
zh: E472g, 琥珀酰化甘油单酯

en: E473, Sucrose esters of fatty acids, Sucroesters, sugar ester, sucrose esters
xx: E473
bg: E473, Естери на мастни киселини и захароза, Сукроестери
ca: E473, Sucroèster d'àcids grassos
cs: E473, Estery sacharosy s mastnými kyselinami, Estery sacharosy
da: E473, Saccharoseestere af fedtsyrer
de: E473, Zuckerester von Speisefettsäuren, Saccharoseester, Zuckerester, E 473, Saccharoseester von Speisefettsäuren
el: E473, Εστερες λιπαρων οξεων με σακχαροζη, Εστεροσάκχαρα
es: E473, Sucroésteres de ácidos grasos, Sucroésteres, Ésteres de sacarosa de los ácidos grasos
et: E473, Rasvhapete sahharoosestrid
fi: E473, Rasvahappojen sakkaroosiesterit, Sakkaroosiesterit, Rasvahappojen sakkaroosiestereitä, Sakkaroosiestereitä
fr: E473, Sucroester, sucroesters, Esters de saccharose d'acides gras, Saccharoesters, sucroesters d'acides gras, sucroesters d'acide gras
hu: E473, Zsírsavak szacharóz-észterei, Szacharóz-észterek
it: E473, Esteri di saccarosio degli acidi grassi, Sucresteri, esteri del saccarosio con acidi grassi, sucrestere
lt: E473, Riebalų rūgščių sacharozės esteriai, Sacharozės esteriai
lv: E473, Taukskābju saharozes esteri, Saharozes esteri
mt: E473, Esteri tas-sukrożju tal-aċidi grassi, Sukroesteri
nl: E473, Sucrose-esters van vetzuren, Sucro-esters
nn: E473, sukroseestere av fettsyrer
pl: E473, Estry kwasów tłuszczowych i sacharozy, Cukroestry
pt: E473, Ésteres de sacarose de ácidos gordos, Ésteres de sacarose
ro: E473, Esteri ai zaharozei cu acizi grași, Zaharoesteri, Sucroesteri
sk: E473, Estery sacharózy s mastnými kyselinami, Sacharoestery
sl: E473, Saharozni estri maščobnih kislin, saharozni estri
sv: E473, Sackarosestrar av fettsyror, Sackarosestrar

en: E473a, Oligoesters of sucrose type I, Oligoesters of sucrose type II, Oligoesters of sucrose, Oligoesters of sucrose
xx: E473a
bg: E473a, Олигоестери от захароза тип I, Олигоестери от захароза тип II, Олигоестери от захароза
cs: E473a, Oligoestery sacharosy typu I, Oligoestery sacharosy typu II, Oligoestery sacharosy, Oligoestery sacharosy
da: E473a, Oligoestere af sukrose type I, Oligoestere af sukrose type II, Oligoestere af sukrose, Oligoestere af sukrose
de: E473a, Oligoester von Saccharose Typ I, Oligoester von Saccharose Typ II, Oligoester von Saccharose, Oligoester von Saccharose
el: E473a, Ολιγοεστέρες σακχάρου τύπου I, Ολιγοεστέρες σακχάρου τύπου II, Ολιγοεστέρες σακχάρου, Ολιγοεστέρες σακχάρου
es: E473a, Oligoésteres de sacarosa tipo I, Oligoésteres de sacarosa tipo II, Oligoésteres de sacarosa, Oligoésteres de sacarosa
et: E473a, Sahharoosi oligoestrid tüüp I, Sahharoosi oligoestrid tüüp II, Sahharoosi oligoestrid, Sahharoosi oligoestrid
fi: E473a, Sakkaroosin oligoesterit tyyppi I, Sakkaroosin oligoesterit tyyppi II, Sakkaroosin oligoesterit, Sakkaroosin oligoesterit
fr: E473a, Oligoesters de saccharose de type I, Oligoesters de saccharose de type II, Oligoesters de saccharose, Oligoesters de saccharose
hu: E473a, Szacharóz oligoészterei, Szacharóz oligoészterek I. típusú, Szacharóz oligoészterek II. típusú, Szacharóz oligoészterek, Szacharóz oligoészterek
it: E473a, Oligoesteri di saccarosio di tipo I, Oligoesteri di saccarosio di tipo II, Oligoesteri di saccarosio, Oligoesteri di saccarosio
lt: E473a, Sacharozės oligoestrai I tipo, Sacharozės oligoestrai II tipo, Sacharozės oligoestrai, Sacharozės oligoestrai
lv: E473a, Saharozes oligoestri I tips, Saharozes oligoestri II tips, Saharozes oligoestri, Saharozes oligoestri
mt: E473a, Oligoestri tas-sukrożju tip I, Oligoestri tas-sukrożju tip II, Oligoestri tas-sukrożju, Oligoestri tas-sukrożju
nl: E473a, Oligo-esters van sacharose type I, Oligo-esters van sacharose type II, Oligo-esters van sacharose, Oligo-esters van sacharose
pl: E473a, Oligoestry sacharozy typu I, Oligoestry sacharozy typu II, Oligoestry sacharozy, Oligoestry sacharozy
pt: E473a, Oligoésteres de sacarose tipo I, Oligoésteres de sacarose tipo II, Oligoésteres de sacarose, Oligoésteres de sacarose
ro: E473a, Oligoesteri de zaharoză de tip I, Oligoesteri de zaharoză de tip II, Oligoesteri de zaharoză, Oligoesteri de zaharoză
sk: E473a, Oligoestery sacharózy typu I, Oligoestery sacharózy typu II, Oligoestery sacharózy, Oligoestery sacharózy
sl: E473a, Oligoestri saharoze tipa I, Oligoestri saharoze tipa II, Oligoestri saharoze, Oligoestri saharoze
sv: E473a, Oligoestrar av sackaros typ I, Oligoestrar av sackaros typ II, Oligoestrar av sackaros, Oligoestrar av sackaros

en: E474, Sucroglycerides, Sucroglyceride
xx: E474
bg: E474, Захароглицериди
ca: E474, Sucroglicèrid
cs: E474, Sacharoglyceridy
da: E474, Saccharoseestere i blanding med mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E474, Zuckerglyceride
el: E474, Σακχαρογλυκεριδια
es: E474, Sucroglicéridos
et: E474, Sahharoglütseriidid, Suhkruglütseriidid
fi: E474, Sokeriglyseridit, Sokeriglyseridejä
fr: E474, Sucroglycérides
hu: E474, Szaharózgliceridek, Cukorgliceridek
it: E474, Sucrogliceridi
lt: E474, Sacharozės gliceridai
lv: E474, Saharozes glicerīdi
mt: E474, Sukrogliċeridi
nl: E474, Sucroglyceriden
pl: E474, Sacharoglicerydy
pt: E474, Sacaridoglicéridos
ro: E474, Zaharogliceride
sk: E474, Sacharoglyceridy
sl: E474, Saharozni gliceridi
sv: E474, Sackarosestrar i blandning med mono- och diglycerider av fettsyror

en: E475, Polyglycerol esters of fatty acids, Polyglycerol fatty acid esters
xx: E475
bg: E475, Полиглицеролови естери на мастни киселини
ca: E475, Èster poliglicèrid d'àcids grassos
cs: E475, Estery polyglycerolu s mastnými kyselinami
da: E475, Polyglycerolestere af fedtsyrer
de: E475, Polyglycerinester von Speisefettsäuren
el: E475, Πολυγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E475, Ésteres poliglicéricos de ácidos grasos
et: E475, Rasvhapete polüglütseroolestrid
fi: E475, Rasvahappojen polyglyseroliesterit, Rasvahappojen polyglyseroliestereitä
fr: E475, Esters polyglycériques d'acides gras
ga: E475, eistir pholaigliocróil d'aigéid shailleacha
hr: E475, poliglicerolni esteri masnih kiselina
hu: E475, Zsírsavak poliglicerin-észterei, Poliglicerin-zsírsav-észterek
it: E475, Esteri poliglicerici degli acidi grassi
lt: E475, Riebalų rūgščių poliglicerolio esteriai
lv: E475, Taukskābju poliglicerīna esteri
mt: E475, Esteri tal-poligliċerol tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E475, Polyglycerolesters van vetzuren, Polyglycerolvetzuuresters
pl: E475, Estry kwasów tłuszczowych i poliglicerolu
pt: E475, Ésteres de poliglicerol de ácidos gordos
ro: E475, Esteri poliglicerici ai acizilor grași
ru: E475, Полиглицериновые эфиры жирных кислот, e475, эфиры полиглицерина и жирных кислот, полиглицерина и жирных кислот эфиры
sk: E475, Estery polyglycerolu s mastnými kyselinami
sl: E475, Poliglicerolni estri maščobnih kislin
sv: E475, Polyglycerolestrar av fettsyror

en: E476, Polyglycerol polyricinoleate, PGPR
xx: E476
ar: E476, بولي غليسيرول بولي ريسينوليات
bg: E476, Полиглицерол полирицинолеат, PGPR
bs: E476, Poliglicerol poliricinoleat
ca: E476, Poliricinoleat de poligliceril
cs: E476, Polyglycerolpolyricinoleát
da: E476, Polyglycerolpolyricinoleat
de: E476, Polyglycerin-Polyricinoleat, PGPR
el: E476, Πολυγλυκεριδια του πολυρικινελαϊκου οξεος
es: E476, Polirricinoleato de poliglicerol, Polyglycerol polyricinoleate, poliglicerol de polirricinoleato
et: E476, Ritsinoolhappe polüglütseroolestrid
fi: E476, Polyglyserolipolyrisiinioleaatti, PGPR, Polyglyserolipolyrisiinioleaatteja
fr: E476, Polyricinoléate de polyglycérol, Esters polyglycériques d'acides gras d'huile de ricin, Esters polyglycériques de l'acide ricinoléique interesterifié, PGPR, Esters polyglycéroliques de l'acide ricinoléique interesterifié, Esters polyglycériques d'acides gras polycondensés d'huile de ricin, Esters glycériques d'acides gras condensés d'huile de ricin
ga: E476, polairicineoláit pholaigliocróil
he: E476, פוליגליצרול פוליריצינולאט, חומר מתחלב, PGPR
hr: E476, poliglicerol - poliricinoleat, poliglicerol poliricinoleat
hu: E476, Poliglicerin-poliricinoleát
it: E476, Poliricinoleato di poliglicerolo
lt: E476, Poliglicerolio poliricinoleatas
lv: E476, Poliglicerīna polirīcinolāts
mt: E476, Poligliċerol poligriċinoleat
nl: E476, Polyglycerolpolyricinoleaat
pl: E476, Polirycynooleinian poliglicerolu
pt: E476, Polirricinoleato de poliglicerol
ro: E476, Poliricinoleat de poliglicerol, poliricinoleat de poliglicerină
ru: E476, Полиглицерол полирицинолеат
sh: E476, Poliglicerol poliricinoleat
sk: E476, Polyglycerolpolyricínoleát
sl: E476, Poliglicerol poliricinoleat
sr: E476, Poliglicerol poliricinoleat
sv: E476, Polyglycerolpolyricinoleat

en: E477, Propane-1\,2-diol esters of fatty acids, Propane-1\,2-diol esters of fatty acids
xx: E477
bg: E477, Пропан-1\,2-диол естери на мастни киселини, Пропан-1,2-диолови естери на мастни киселини
ca: E477, Èster d'1,2-propà-diol d'àcids grassos
cs: E477, Estery propan-1\,2-diolu s mastnými kyselinami
da: E477, Propylenglycolestere af fedtsyrer
de: E477, Propylenglycolester von Speisefettsäuren
el: E477, Εστερες λιπαρων οξεων με προπανοδιολη-1\,2
es: E477, Ésteres de propano-1\,2-diol de ácidos grasos, Mono y diésteres de 1,2 propilenglicol, ésteres de ácidos grasos con propilenglicol
et: E477, Rasvhapete propüleenglükoolestrid
fi: E477, Rasvahappojen propyleeniglykoliesterit, Rasvahappojen propyleeniglykoliestereitä
fr: E477, Esters du propylène-glycol d'acide gras, Esters du propylène glycol d'acides gras, Esters de propane-1\,2-diol d'acides gras
hr: E477, propan-1\,2-diol esteri masnih kiselina
hu: E477, Zsírsavak propán-1\,2-diol-észterei
it: E477, Esteri dell'1\,2-propandiolo degli acidi grassi
lt: E477, Riebalų rūgščių propan-1\,2-diolio esteriai
lv: E477, Taukskābju propān-1\,2-diola esteri
mt: E477, Esteri tal-propan-1\,2-diol tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E477, Esters van propaan-1\,2-diol met vetzuren
pl: E477, Estry kwasów tłuszczowych i glikolu propylenowego
pt: E477, Ésteres de propano-1\,2-diol de ácidos gordos
ro: E477, Esteri 1\,2-propandiolici ai acizilor grași
ru: E477, эфиры пропиленгликоля и жирных кислот
sk: E477, Propán-1\,2-diolestery mastných kyselín
sl: E477, Propan-1\,2-diolni estri maščobnih kislin
sv: E477, 1\,2-propylenglykolestrar av fettsyror

en: E478, Lactylated fatty acid esters of glycerol and propane-1
xx: E478
bg: E478, Лактилирани естери на мастни киселини на глицерол и пропан-1
ca: E478, Èsters lactilats d'àcids grassos de glicerol i propà-1
cs: E478, Laktylované estery mastných kyselin glycerolu a propanu-1
da: E478, Lactylerede fedtsyreestere af glycerol og propan-1
de: E478, Lactylierte Fettsäureester von Glycerin und Propan-1
el: E478, Γαλακτυλιωμένοι εστέρες λιπαρών οξέων γλυκερόλης και προπανίου-1
es: E478, Ésteres lactilados de ácidos grasos de glicerol y propano-1
et: E478, Glütserooli ja propaan-1 lakteeritud rasvhapete estrid
fi: E478, Glyserolin ja propyleeniglykolin laktyloitujen rasvahappojen esterit
fr: E478, Esters lactyles d'acides gras du glycérol et du propane-1
hr: E478, Laktilirani esteri masnih kiselina glicerola i propana-1
hu: E478, tej- és zsírsavak glicerin és propilén-glikol-észterei
it: E478, Esteri lattoilati di acidi grassi di glicerolo e propano-1
lt: E478, Glicerolio ir propano-1 laktiliuotų riebalų rūgščių esteriai
lv: E478, Glicerīna un propāna-1 laktilēti taukskābju esteri
nl: E478, Mengsel van glycerol- en propyleenglycolesters met melkzuur en vetzuren
pl: E478, Laktylowane estry kwasów tłuszczowych glicerolu i propanu-1
pt: E478, Ésteres lactilados de ácidos graxos de glicerol e propano-1
ro: E478, Esteri lactilați ai acizilor grași ai glicerolului și propanului-1
sk: E478, Laktylované estery mastných kyselín glycerolu a propánu-1
sl: E478, Laktilirani estri maščobnih kislin glicerola in propana-1
sv: E478, Laktylerade fettsyraestrar av glycerol och propan-1

en: E479b, Thermally oxidised soya bean oil interacted with mono- and diglycerides of fatty acids, Thermally oxidised soya bean oil interacted with mono­ and diglycerides of fatty acids
xx: E479b
bg: E479b, Термично окислено соево масло с моно-и диглицериди на мастни киселини
ca: E479b, Oli de soja oxidat tèrmicament i en interacció amb monoglicèrids i diglicèrids d'àcids grassos
cs: E479b, Směsný produkt interakce tepelně opracovaného sójového oleje s mono- a diglyceridy mastných kyselin
da: E479b, Termisk oxideret sojaolie omsat med mono- og diglycerider af fedtsyrer
de: E479b, Thermooxidiertes Sojaöl verestert mit Mono- und Diglyceriden von Speisefettsäuren
el: E479b, Θερμικως οξειδωμενο σογιελαιο που εχει αντιδρασει με μονο- και διγλυκεριδια λιπαρων οξεων
es: E479b, Aceite de soja oxidado térmicamente en interacción con monoglicéridos y diglicéridos de ácidos grasos
et: E479b, Termiliselt oksüdeeritud sojaõli rasvhapete mono- ja diglütseriidide estrid
fi: E479b, Termisesti hapetettu polymeroitu soijaöljy
fr: E479b, Huile de soja oxydée par chauffage ayant réagi avec des mono- et diglycérides d’acides gras, Huile de soja oxydée par chauffage ayant réagi avec des mono- et diglycérides d'acides gras
hu: E479b, Hőkezeléssel oxidált szójaolaj zsírsavak mono- és digliceridjeivel reagáltatva
it: E479b, Prodotto di reazione dell'olio di soia ossidato termicamente con mono- e digliceridi degli acidi grassi, Olio di soia ossidato
lt: E479b, Termiškai oksiduotas sojų aliejus, paveiktas riebalų rūgščių mono- ir digliceridų
lv: E479b, Termiski oksidētas sojas eļļas iedarbības produkts ar taukskābju mono- un diglicerīdiem
mt: E479b, Żejt tas-sojja termalment ossidizzat b'interazzjoni mal-mono- u d-digliċeridi tal-aċidi grassi
nl: E479b, Thermisch geoxideerde sojaolie, na reactie met mono- en diglyceriden van vetzuren
pl: E479b, Termoutleniony olej sojowy z mono- i diglicerydami kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E479b, Óleo de soja oxidado termicamente em interacção com mono e diglicéridos de ácidos gordos
ro: E479b, Ulei de soia oxidat termic interacționat cu mono- și digliceridele acizilor grași
sk: E479b, Tepelne zoxidovaný olej sójových bôbov zreagovaný s mono- a diglyceridmi mastných kyselín
sl: E479b, Toplotno oksidirano sojino olje, v interakciji z mono- in digliceridi maščobnih kislin
sv: E479b, Termiskt oxiderad sojabönsolja som reagerat med mono- och diglycerider av fettsyror